New Jersey, session 222, A3237.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2021, c.444 (C.40:48-2.12s3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  The governing body of any municipality may adopt ordinances to: (1)   create a property registration program for the purposes of identifying and monitoring residential and commercial properties within the municipality for which a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose on a mortgage has been filed; (2)   regulate the care, maintenance, security, and upkeep of the exterior of vacant and abandoned residential and commercial properties for which a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose has been filed; and (3) impose property registration fees on the creditor of residential or commercial properties on an annual or semi-annual basis. b.    An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall: (1)  require that the creditor filing a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose shall, in addition to the notice provided to the municipality pursuant to section 17 of P.L.2008, c.127 (C.46:10B-51) or section 2 of P.L.2021, c.444 (C.40:48-2.12s2), register the residential or commercial property with the municipality's property registration program as a property in foreclosure and, as part of that registration: (a) provide the municipality with the information regarding the creditor required by paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 17 of P.L.2008, c.127 (C.46:10B-51) or paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.444 (C.40:48-2.12s2); (b) identify the date the summons and complaint in an action to foreclose on a mortgage was filed against the subject property, the court in which it was filed, and the docket number of the filing; and (c) identify whether the property is vacant and abandoned in accordance with the definition in the ordinance required by paragraph (8) of this subsection; (2) require, if there is any change in the name, address, or telephone number for a representative, agent, or individual authorized to accept service on behalf of a creditor required to register pursuant to the property registration program following the filing of the summons and complaint, the creditor shall update the property registration program within 10 days of the change in that information; (3)  require that the creditor filing a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose shall, if the registered property becomes vacant and abandoned in accordance with the definition in the ordinance required by paragraph (8) of this subsection after the property is initially registered with the municipality, update the property registration with the municipality to reflect the change in the property's status; (4)  require that the creditor filing a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose shall be responsible for the care, maintenance, security, and upkeep of the exterior of the property if the property is vacant and abandoned at any time while the property is registered with the property registration program; (5)  require that a creditor located out-of-State shall be responsible for appointing an in-State representative or agent to act for the foreclosing creditor; (6)  identify any requirements that the municipality imposes on the creditor filing a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose on a property, that is or becomes vacant and abandoned, relating to the care, maintenance, security, and upkeep of the exterior of the property, including, but not limited to, any requirements to secure the property against unauthorized entry, post a sign affixed to the inside of the property and visible to the public indicating the name, address, and telephone number of the creditor or an out-of-State creditor's in-State representative or agent for the purpose of receiving service of process, or acquire and otherwise maintain liability insurance by procuring a vacancy policy, covering any damage to any person or any property caused by any physical condition of the property while registered with the property registration program; (7)  identify any fees that may be imposed on the creditor in connection with the property registration program that are authorized pursuant to subsection e. of this section; and (8)  define that a property shall be considered vacant and abandoned if it is not legally occupied by a mortgagor or tenant, which is in such condition that it cannot be legally reoccupied, because of the presence or finding of at least two of the following: (a)   overgrown or neglected vegetation; (b)   the accumulation of newspapers, circulars, flyers, or mail on the property; (c)   disconnected gas, electric, or water utility services to the property; (d)   the accumulation of hazardous, noxious, or unhealthy substances or materials on the property; (e)   the accumulation of junk, litter, trash, or debris on the property; (f)   the absence of window treatments such as blinds, curtains, or shutters; (g)   the absence of furnishings and personal items; (h)   statements of neighbors, delivery persons, or government employees indicating that the property is vacant and abandoned; (i)    windows or entrances to the property that are boarded up or closed off, or multiple window panes that are damaged, broken, and unrepaired; (j)    doors to the property that are smashed through, broken off, unhinged, or continuously unlocked; (k)   a risk to the health, safety, or welfare of the public or any adjoining or adjacent property owners due to acts of vandalism, loitering, criminal conduct, or the physical destruction or deterioration of the property; (l)    an uncorrected violation of a municipal building, housing, or similar code during the preceding year, or an order by municipal authorities declaring the property to be unfit for occupancy and to remain vacant and unoccupied; (m) the mortgagee or other authorized party has secured or winterized the property due to the property being deemed vacant and unprotected or in danger of freezing; (n)   a written statement issued by a mortgagor expressing the clear intent of all mortgagors to abandon the property; or (o)   any other reasonable indicia of abandonment. c.     An ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall authorize a public officer, designated or appointed pursuant to P.L.1942, c.112 (C.40:48-2.3 et seq.), or any other local official responsible for administration of any property maintenance or public nuisance code to issue a notice to the creditor filing the summons and complaint in an action to foreclose, if the public officer or other authorized municipal official determines that the creditor has violated the ordinance.  In the case of a violation for failure to provide care, maintenance, security, and upkeep of the exterior of vacant and abandoned property, such notice shall require the person or entity to correct the violation within 30 days of receipt of the notice, or within 10 days of receipt of the notice if the violation presents an imminent threat to public health and safety. d.    A municipality may contract with and set the compensation of a private entity, pursuant to the "Local Public Contracts Law," P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.), to assist the municipality in the implementation and administration of the property registration program established pursuant to an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  A county or county improvement authority may similarly contract with a private entity to assist the county or authority in the implementation and administration of a property registration system established for the use of a municipality with a property registration program established pursuant to an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section as well as for the use of the county or improvement authority. A local unit may delegate to such private entity any duties under the property registration program, including, without limitation, identifying properties located within the municipality that are subject to the registration requirements of the property registration program, maintaining and updating the property registrations for the municipality, communicating with the creditors or the in-State representative or agent appointed by creditors located out of State of such properties, invoicing and collecting payment from the creditors for such properties any fees authorized by the ordinance and subsection e. of this section, and monitoring compliance with the requirements of the ordinance.  A local unit may conduct property registration services on behalf of a municipality pursuant to a shared services agreement subject to the "Uniform Shared Services and Consolidation Act," P.L.2007, c.63 (C.40A:65-1 et al.).  Property registration fees imposed pursuant to subsection e. of this section and an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be considered a municipal charge pursuant to the "tax sale law," R.S.54:5-1 et seq., regardless of whether the fees are being collected by a third-party entity or by the municipality directly.  The Local Finance Board of the Department of Community Affairs may adopt rules and regulations pertaining to contracts, entered pursuant to this subsection, with third-party entities for the implementation and administration of a property registration program. e.     (1)  A municipality may impose an annual fee on a creditor required to register a property pursuant to an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The fee shall not exceed: [(1)] (a) $500 per property annually for any property that is required to be registered because a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose was filed by the creditor; and [(2)] (b) an additional $2,000 per property annually if the property is vacant or abandoned pursuant to the definition in the ordinance when the summons and complaint in an action to foreclose is filed, or becomes vacant and abandoned pursuant to the definition in the ordinance at any time thereafter while the property is in foreclosure.  All such annual fees and the due dates thereof shall be identified in the ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (2)   A municipality shall not impose an annual fee on a creditor pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection if: (a)  the subject property is included in a bankruptcy under chapter 7 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. s.701 et seq., or chapter 13 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. s.1301 et seq.; and (b)  the automatic stay provided under subsection (a) of section 362 of the federal Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. s.362(a)) has not been vacated. f.     Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.40A:5-15 to the contrary, any property registration fees imposed pursuant to subsection e. of this section and an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section and collected by a third-party entity contracted with pursuant to subsections d. and e. of this section shall be paid over to the municipality within a timeframe specified in the contract between the municipality and the third-party entity.  Amounts collected by the third-party entity on behalf of the local unit shall be paid over in full to the local unit without any amount deducted as payment for services rendered by the third-party entity.  Once the collected fees are paid over to the local unit, the officer charged with the custody of the general funds shall deposit all such funds within 48 hours after the receipt thereof to the credit of the municipality in its designated legal depository.  A third-party entity shall collect and pay over to the municipality any interest and penalties, based upon the rate of interest and penalties fixed by the governing body of the municipality for late payment of property taxes, assessments, and other municipal charges pursuant to R.S.54:4-67, for late payment of the property registration fees imposed pursuant to subsection e. of this section and an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The third-party entity shall at least once a year, or as requested by the municipal tax collector, file a certification as may be required by the tax collector to enforce tax liens for all unpaid property registration program fees due and owing at the time the certification is filed. g.  (1) An out-of-State creditor subject to an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section found by the municipal court of the municipality in which the property subject to the ordinance is located, or by any other court of competent jurisdiction, to be in violation of the requirement to appoint an in-State representative or agent pursuant to the ordinance shall be subject to a fine of $2,500 for each day of the violation.  Any fines imposed on a creditor for the failure to appoint an in-State representative or agent shall commence on the day after the 10-day period set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 17 of P.L.2008, c.127 (C.46:10B-51) or paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 2 of P.L.2021, c.444 (C.40:48-2.12s2) for providing notice to the municipal clerk that a summons and complaint in an action to foreclose on a mortgage has been served. (2)   A creditor subject to an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section found by the municipal court of the municipality in which the property subject to the ordinance is located, or by any other court of competent jurisdiction, to be in violation, excluding only a violation addressed by paragraph (1) of this subsection, of the ordinance shall be subject to a fine of $1,500 for each day of the violation.  Any fines imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall commence 31 days following receipt of the notice of violation, except if the violation presents an imminent risk to public health and safety, in which case any fines shall commence 11 days following receipt of the notice. h.    No less than 20 percent of any money collected pursuant to subsection f. or g. of this section or an ordinance adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be utilized by the municipality for municipal code enforcement purposes. i.     As used in this section: "Creditor" means a mortgagee or an agent or assignee of a mortgagee, such as the servicer, who has filed a complaint in the Superior Court seeking to foreclose upon a residential or commercial mortgage.  If the entity seeking to foreclose upon the residential or commercial mortgage changes as a result of an assignment, transfer, or otherwise after the filing of the foreclosure complaint in the Superior Court, the new entity shall be deemed the creditor for purposes of this section.  For purposes of this section, a creditor shall not include the State, a political subdivision of the State, a State, county, or local government entity, or their agent or assignee, such as the servicer. "Local unit" means a municipality, a county, or a county improvement authority or other subdivision of a municipality or county. (cf: P.L.2021, c.444, s.3) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.